Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.190

Designation of state patrol as agent for surrender of drivers' licenses.

The director of licensing may designate the Washington state patrol as an agent to secure the surrender of drivers' licenses which have been suspended, revoked, or canceled pursuant to law.

[ 1979 c 158 s 123; 1965 c 156 s 19.]